hfst/noun-som-lex.txt
! Reduplication seems to work... 
LEXICON D4_M
af    NOUN4_M "mouth, language" ;			! afaf
buug  NOUN4_M "book"  ;					! buugag
god		NOUN4_M			"hole (esp. in the ground)"       ;
hadh	NOUN4_M			"shade"                           ;
heyl	NOUN4_M			"cardamom"                        ;
jeeb	NOUN4_M			"pocket"                          ;
jid		NOUN4_M			"road"                            ;
jidh	NOUN4_M			"body"                            ;
koob	NOUN4_M			"cup"                             ;
mar		NOUN4_M		"time, occasion"                      ;
mas		NOUN4_M			"snake"                           ;
miis	NOUN4_M			"table"                           ;
muus	NOUN4_M			"banana"                          ;
nin		NOUN4_M			"man"                     ;	! (-m)  
qol		NOUN4_M		"room"                                ;
qoys	NOUN4_M		"family"                              ;		
rah		NOUN4_M		"frog"                  ; ! TODO: raha, ruhu; not *rahka, *rahku
dab		NOUN4_M	"fire" ;        
caan	NOUN4_M		"fame"                             ; 
dal		NOUN4_M		"country"                          ; 
dhar	NOUN4_M		"clothes, fabric"                  ; 
dhib	NOUN4_M		"problem, difficulty"              ; 
dhul	NOUN4_M		"earth, land"                      ; 
gaab	NOUN4_M		"shortness"                        ;
san		NOUN4_M		"nose" ;
shaadh	NOUN4_M		"shirt" ; 
shaag	NOUN4_M		"tyre" ;
shir	NOUN4_M		"meeting" ;
tog		NOUN4_M		"dry valley, ravine" ; 
toos	NOUN4_M		"directness, straightness" ; 
war		NOUN4_M		"news" ; 
xaas	NOUN4_M		"wife, wife and children" ; 
xag		NOUN4_M		"direction, side" ; 
xoog	NOUN4_M		"force, army" ; 
roob	NOUN4_M		"rain" ; 
xeer	NOUN4_M		"law, rule, regulation" ;
xil		NOUN4_M 	"shame, dishonor" ;
fal		NOUN4_M		"deed, do" ; ! do?
! ur		NOUN4_M		"air" ; ! TODO: also a separate word urur 'assembly', fem. 

LEXICON D4_M_b
qof   NOUN4_M "person" ; ! TODO: qofqof or qofof? currently gens qofaf. :(



! Rechecked these in orwin, listed as f. wtf?
LEXICON D4_F
dul:dul		NOUN4_F	"top, surface" ;
gees:gees	NOUN4_F "side"            ; 
goob:goob	NOUN4_F "site, position"  ; 
hor:hor		NOUN4_F "front part"      ; 
qoor:qoor	NOUN4_F "neck"            ; 
seef:seef	NOUN4_F	"sword" ;


LEXICON D5
D5_M ;
D5_M_Prop ;
! D5_F ;

LEXICON D5_M
ardey NOUN5_M "student" ;
ardey:arday NOUN5_M "student" ; ! Spelling variant  ! ardáy 'student' - ardaý 'students'; ardáyga 'the student', - ardaýda 'the students'; should I correct spelling variation by setting the lemma as the standard variant? 
madax:madax NOUN5_M "head" ; 
madax+Dec/5M:madax  NOUN5_M "head" ;                 ! madaxyo	 also d2   ! madaxa +M+Def+Sg madaxda +F+Def+Pl
haad:haad NOUN5_M "large bird, esp- of prey" ;
caday	NOUN5_M	"tooth-brushing stick" ; 
carab	NOUN5_M	"an arab"              ;
dameer	NOUN5_M	"male donkey"          ;
ey		NOUN5_M	"dog"                  ;
ugax	NOUN5_M	"egg (of birds other than chickens)" ; ! TODO: ugxan - pl


LEXICON D5_M_Prop
Soomaali NOUN5_M "a Somali" ; 


LEXICON D6
D6_F ;
D6_M ;
D6_F_Mass ;
D6_F_Coll ;

LEXICON D6_F 
afo:af{o}			NOUN6_F 	"wife"                        ;
boosto:boost{o}		NOUN6_F 	"post office"                 ;
budo:bud{o}		NOUN6_F 	"flour"                       ;
cadho:cadh{o}		NOUN6_F 	"anger"                       ;
casho:cash{o}		NOUN6_F 	"day"                         ;
degmo:degm{o}		NOUN6_F 	"settlement, community"       ;		! degmada, degmadaha
dhismo:dhism{o}		NOUN6_F 	"building"                    ;
qaaddo:qaadd{o}		NOUN6_F	"spoon"						  ;
guntiino:guntiin{o}	NOUN6_F 	"woman's dress-like garment"    ;		
hawo:haw{o}		NOUN6_F 	"air, weather"                  ;
hooyo:hooy{o}		NOUN6_F 	"mother"                        ;
masiibo:masiib{o}		NOUN6_F 	"calamity"                      ;
qaaddo:qaadd{o}		NOUN6_F 	"spoon"                         ;
kiilo:kiil{o}		NOUN6_F 	"kilogram"						; 
shaneemo:shaneem{o}	NOUN6_F	"film";
shaqo:shaq{o}		NOUN6_F	"work";
sheeko:sheek{o}		NOUN6_F	"story";
talo:tal{o}		NOUN6_F	"advice, decision";
tuulo:tuul{o}		NOUN6_F	"village";
waddo:wadd{o}		NOUN6_F	"road";
xiiso:xiis{o}		NOUN6_F	"interest, fascination";
yaanyo:yaany{o}		NOUN6_F	"tomato";
magaalo:magaal{o}		NOUN6_F "town"                        ;


LEXICON D6_M
dhismo 		NOUNM	"building" 					;
gudo		NOUNM "inside, interior"            ;
moxoggo		NOUNM "cassava"                     ;



! magaalaa
! magaalad
! magaalada
! magaaladaas
! magaaladaiisa
! magaaladan
! magaaladanelspruit
! magaaladatan
! magaaladda
! magaaladu
! magaalamadaxda
! magaalo
! magaalooyin
! magaalooyinka

! -o in pl only.


LEXICON D6_F_Mass
cunto	 NOUNF "food" ; 

LEXICON D6_F_Coll
socoto	NOUNF	"travellers" ;


LEXICON D7
D7_M ;
D7_F ;

LEXICON D7_M
aabbe     NOUNM    "father" ;
geeltoosiye	NOUNM "type of vulture"         ;
gole		NOUNM "assembly, committee"     ;
hoggamiye	NOUNM "leader"                  ;
masalle		NOUNM "prayer mat"              ;
mooye		NOUNM "mortar"                  ;
oday		NOUNM "old man; elder"          ;
qorfe		NOUNM "cinnamon"                ;
qumbe		NOUNM "coconut"                 ;
madaxweyne	NOUNM 	"president"             ;
qalalaase	NOUNM 	"disturbance"           ;
buste		NOUNM "blanket"                  ;
cambe		NOUNM "mango"                    ;
danjire		NOUNM "ambassador"               ;
dhegayare	NOUNM "clove"                    ;
dukaanle	NOUNM "shopkeeper"               ;
fiise		NOUNM "visa"                     ;
fure		NOUNM "key"                      ;
aabbe		NOUNM "father"                   ;
adduunweyne	NOUNM "international community"  ;
biyo		NOUNM "water"                    ;
tagsile		NOUNM "taxi owner"; 
waraabe		NOUNM "hyena";
xoghaye		NOUNM "secretary";


! Listed without declension information in Orwin, but perhaps also had Col. or Mass. info
LEXICON Unknown_Declensions
	UNKNOWN_F ; 
	UNKNOWN_F_COL ; 
	UNKNOWN_F_MASS ;
	UNKNOWN_M ; 
	UNKNOWN_M_COL ; 
	UNKNOWN_M_MASS ;
	UNKNOWN_M_PL ; 
	UNKNOWN_EVERYTHING ;

! TODO: unknown words
LEXICON UNKNOWN_EVERYTHING
riyo+N+Pl:riyo		# 	"goats (in general)" ;


LEXICON UNKNOWN_F
hurdo		NOUNF "sleep"                   ;
il			NOUNF "eye" 					;   		! indho (m.) eyes
indho+N+Masc+Pl:il	NOUNF "eyes"					;
ilaalin		NOUNF "watching over"           ;
in			NOUNF "part, amount"            ;
jariidad	NOUNF "newspaper" 				;   		! jaraa'id (m.); arabic loan
jaraa'id+N+Masc+Pl:jariidad		NOUNF		"newspapers" ; 
koonfur		NOUNF "south"                   ;
midig		NOUNF "right"                   ;
qurux		NOUNF "beauty"                  ;
askar		NOUNF "soldier"                         ; 
bocor		NOUNF "pumpkin"                         ; 
cid			NOUNF "someone"                         ; 
dabo		NOUNF "back part, behind"               ; 
dar			NOUNF "reason"                          ; 
Dayr		NOUNF "Sept-Nov, lesser wet season"     ; 
dhuxul		NOUNF "charcoal"                        ; 
gaajo		NOUNF "hunger"                          ; 
gallay		NOUNF "maize"                           ; 
run			NOUNF "truth"; 
si			NOUNF "way"; ! TODO: siyaabo (m) pl
sisin		NOUNF "sesame" ; 
suugaan		NOUNF "literature" ; 
talogelyo	NOUNF "seeking advice" ; 
toon		NOUNF "garlic" ; 
xabbad		NOUNF "unit (of something), piece" ; 
xulufo		NOUNF "allies" ; 


LEXICON UNKNOWN_F_COL
lo'			NOUNF "cattle"			; 
carruur		NOUNF "children"       ; 
digir		NOUNF "beans, peas"    ; 
soor		NOUNF "porridge-type food made from different grains" ; 
timir		NOUNF "dates" ; 
ukun		NOUNF "eggs (edible, mostly of chickens)" ; 
xoolaley	NOUNF "livestock keepers" ;  ! TODO: is -ley productive? 


LEXICON UNKNOWN_F_MASS
lacag		NOUNF	"money"		;
cusbo		NOUNF "salt"             ; 
filfil		NOUNF "black pepper"     ;
saliid		NOUNF "oil" ; 
sonkor		NOUNF "suger" ; 

LEXICON UNKNOWN_F_PL
ciidammo	NOUNF	"forces" ;

! N ? ?		dagaal sokeeye	"civil war"
